Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB485.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part V of Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGYSec.4301. Definitions.4302. Accessibility standards.4303. Procurement.4304. Effect of chapter.§ 4301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessibility." Perceivable, operable and understandable digital content that enables an individual with a disability to access the same information, engage in the same interactions and enjoy the same services offered to individuals without a disability, with the same privacy, independence and ease of use aspects that exist for individuals without a disability."Disability." As defined in 42 U.S.C. § 12102(1) (relating to definition of disability) and its implementing regulations."Individual with a disability." As the term "qualified individual with a disability" is defined in 42 U.S.C. § 12131(2) (relating to definitions)."Municipality." Any of the following:(1) A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule municipality.(2) A department, board, commission or other officer or agency of an entity under paragraph (1)."Office." The Office of Information Technology of the Commonwealth's Office of Administration."Public entity." As follows:(1) Any of the following:(i) The Governor or a department, board, commission, authority or other officer or agency of the Commonwealth.(ii) A municipality.(2) The term does not include:(i) A court or an officer or agency of the unified judicial system.(ii) The General Assembly or an officer or agency of the General Assembly.(iii) A State-related institution, as defined in 20250HB0485PN0468 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 2001-C of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(iv) The State System of Higher Education or any of its institutions.§ 4302. Accessibility standards.(a) Duties of chief information officer.--The chief information officer of the office shall:(1) Maintain accessibility standards for individuals with a disability for information technology systems employed by public entities that:(i) Provide individuals with a disability with access to information stored electronically by public entities by ensuring compatibility with adaptive technology systems so that individuals with a disability have full and equal access when needed.(ii) Are designed to present information, including prompts used for interactive communications, in formats intended for both visual and nonvisual use, such as the use of text-only options.(2) Consistent with the responsibilities of the office, promote and monitor the accessibility standards for individuals with a disability in the State's information technology infrastructure, including architecture. Each public entity shall comply with the accessibility standards established by the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327) in the creation and promulgation of any online content and materials used by the public entity.(3) Consult with public entities and representatives of individuals with a disability in developing and maintaining 20250HB0485PN0468 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the accessibility standards for individuals with a disability.(4) Develop accessibility standards for individuals with a disability using the web content accessibility guidelines promulgated and published by the World Wide Web Consortium Web Accessibility Initiative or the international accessibility guidelines working group, or any successor group or organization. The office may revise the accessibility standards based on updates or revisions of the guidelines, in which case the office shall transmit notice of its revisions to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The revisions shall become effective upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Duties of public entities.--Each public entity shall develop a written plan, including any proposed budget requests, to implement its accessibility standards for individuals with a disability at facilities accessible by the public as follows:(1) No later than July 1, 2026, the public entity shall submit the plan to the office, which shall work collaboratively with the public entity to review the plan and establish an implementation methodology.(2) No later than July 1, 2028, the public entity shall fully implement the plan.§ 4303. Procurement.(a) Minimum standards and criteria.--The office shall approve minimum standards and criteria to be used in the procurement by public entities of supplies, services or construction, as those terms are defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions), regarding adaptive technologies for 20250HB0485PN0468 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonvisual or other disability access uses.(b) Compliance.--Compliance with subsection (a) shall be achieved at the time of procurement of an upgrade or replacement of existing information equipment or software.§ 4304. Effect of chapter.(a) Use by individuals without disability.--Nothing in this chapter shall require the installation of software or peripheral devices used for accessibility for an individual with a disability when the information technology is being used by individuals without a disability.(b) Accessibility required.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the applications, programs and underlying operating systems, including the format of the data, which are used for the manipulation and presentation of information, must permit the installation and effective use of and be compatible with software and peripheral devices that provide accessibility to individuals with a disability.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0485PN0468 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718